Utah statutes.
63M-5-304.   Department of Transportation and county executives -- Cooperation in development or utilization -- Written agreements authorized -- Survey and location work.

(1)  The Department of Transportation and county executives shall cooperate with persons engaged in industrial development or the development of or utilization of natural resources in this state through a natural resource or industrial facility who desire to assist this state or its counties in obtaining financing through prepaid sales or use taxes for improvements to existing state or county roads or the construction of new state or county roads which are necessary to provide access to areas of natural resource or industrial facilities.

(2)  Where it is determined that the improvements or construction referred to cannot be financed with existing public funds or when the necessary improvement or construction would be unduly delayed by postponing the improvements or construction until funds are otherwise available and the Legislature has appropriated the necessary funds pursuant to Section 63M-5-302, the Department of Transportation or any county executive may enter into written agreements with the person engaged or to be engaged in industrial development or the development or utilization of natural resources through a natural resource or industrial facility providing for the necessary improvements or construction if that person agrees to the prepayment of sales or use taxes as provided in this chapter to the extent necessary to provide the funds needed to finance the necessary improvements or construction.

(3)  The agreements shall include the assurances necessary to provide the state or the county adequate funds for the payment of all obligations incurred by the state or county for the necessary improvements or construction and for the transfer of funds and all necessary adjustments, if the funds prepaid exceed the actual expenditures made for the improvements or construction.

(4)  If the actual expenditures made by the state, its agencies, or political subdivisions for the improvements or construction exceed the amount of prepaid sales and use taxes actually imposed by Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act, then no refund shall be allowed for the excess amount prepaid as sales or use taxes.

(5)  Initial survey and location work by the Department of Transportation or a county may proceed prior to the execution of any agreements if otherwise authorized and funded.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

